Washington statutes.
RCW 35.78.030

Committee to adopt uniform design standards.

(1) The design standards committee shall from time to time adopt uniform design standards for major arterial and secondary arterial streets.

(2) By July 1, 2012, and from time to time thereafter, the design standards committee shall adopt standards for bicycle and pedestrian facilities.

[ 2012 c 67 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.78.030. Prior: 1949 c 164 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9300-3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2012 c 67: See note following RCW 35.75.060.